Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-239
Foreign licenses; recognition; board; powers.

For purposes of recognizing licenses which have been issued in other states or countries to practice barbering as a licensed barber or registered barber instructor, the board may:

(1) Enter into a reciprocal agreement with any state which is certified to it by the proper examining board under the provisions of section 71-240; and

(2) Provide for licensure without examination as provided in section 71-239.01.

Laws 1983, LB 87, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 226, § 13;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 63.